New York, session 2025-2026, A11029.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 3-0301 of the environmental 2 conservation law is amended by adding a new paragraph ii to read as 3 follows: 4 ii. Provide freely and make publicly available on its website an annu- 5 al report on radioactive releases or disposals, with respect to informa- 6 tion gathered regarding such activities pursuant to 6 NYCRR 380. In 7 conjunction with the department of health, such report shall be analyzed 8 to show trends and the cumulative impact of such radioactive releases or 9 disposals; provided that other relevant agencies shall be notified if 10 contamination has exceeded standards for maximum allowable level permit- 11 ted in drinking water or food sources, as prescribed by applicable state 12 and federal law; 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04718-01-5